Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.100

Notice to creditor to institute action.

Any person bound as surety upon any contract in writing for the payment of money or the performance of any act, when the right of action has accrued, may require by notice in writing the creditor or obligee forthwith to institute an action upon the contract.

[Code 1881 s 644; RRS s 974. Prior: 1877 p 134 s 647; 1869 p 150 s 584; 1854 p 210 s 426. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 645; RRS s 975, now codified as RCW 19.72.101.]